etc/dictionaries/fr-toutesvariantes.aff
FLAG long
SFX rA Y 28
SFX rA lore lore/54 clore 54
SFX rA lore losant/8 clore 41
SFX rA lore los/6 clore 123
SFX rA lore lose/6 clore 69
SFX rA lore loses/9 clore 70
SFX rA lore los/19 clore 77
SFX rA lore lot/8 .clore 71
SFX rA lore losons/16 clore 46
SFX rA lore losez/13 clore 61
SFX rA lore losent/8 clore 35
SFX rA lore lorai/19 clore 33
SFX rA lore loras/24 clore 32
SFX rA lore lora/8 clore 23
SFX rA lore lorons/16 clore 28
SFX rA lore lorez/13 clore 27
SFX rA lore loront/8 clore 26
SFX rA lore lorais/19 clore 34
SFX rA lore lorait/8 clore 24
SFX rA lore lorions/16 clore 30
SFX rA lore loriez/13 clore 29
SFX rA lore loraient/8 clore 25
SFX rA lore lose/33 clore 76
SFX rA lore loses/41 clore 75
SFX rA lore losions/137 clore 177
SFX rA lore losiez/36 clore 176
SFX rA lore los/36 clore 31
SFX rA lore losons/48 clore 47
SFX rA lore losez/36 clore 63

SFX rB Y 1
SFX rB lore lôt clore 71

SFX rC Y 28
SFX rC clore clore/82 clore 54
SFX rC clore closant/20 clore 41
SFX rC clore clos/6 clore 123
SFX rC clore close/6 clore 69
SFX rC clore closes/9 clore 70
SFX rC clore clos/30 clore 77
SFX rC clore clot/20 clore 71
SFX rC clore closons/15 clore 46
SFX rC clore closez/15 clore 61
SFX rC clore closent/20 clore 35
SFX rC clore clorai/30 clore 33
SFX rC clore cloras/15 clore 32
SFX rC clore clora/20 clore 23
SFX rC clore clorons/15 clore 28
SFX rC clore clorez/15 clore 27
SFX rC clore cloront/20 clore 26
SFX rC clore clorais/30 clore 34
SFX rC clore clorait/20 clore 24
SFX rC clore clorions/15 clore 30
SFX rC clore cloriez/15 clore 29
SFX rC clore cloraient/20 clore 25
SFX rC clore close/60 clore 76
SFX rC clore closes/15 clore 75
SFX rC clore closions/15 clore 177
SFX rC clore closiez/15 clore 176
SFX rC clore clos/15 clore 31
SFX rC clore closons/15 clore 47
SFX rC clore closez/15 clore 63

SFX rD N 4
SFX rD clore clore clore 54
SFX rD clore clos clore 123
SFX rD clore close clore 69
SFX rD clore closes clore 70

SFX tA Y 44
SFX tA re re/54 [dp]re 54
SFX tA re ant/8 [dp]re 41
SFX tA re u/6 [dp]re 73
SFX tA re us/9 [dp]re 72
SFX tA re ue/6 [dp]re 69
SFX tA re ues/9 [dp]re 70
SFX tA re s/19 [dp]re 77
SFX tA dre d/8 dre 71
SFX tA pre pt/8 pre 71
SFX tA re ons/16 [dp]re 46
SFX tA re ez/13 [dp]re 61
SFX tA re ent/8 [dp]re 35
SFX tA re ais/19 [dp]re 53
SFX tA re ait/8 [dp]re 43
SFX tA re ions/16 [dp]re 66
SFX tA re iez/13 [dp]re 65
SFX tA re aient/8 [dp]re 44
SFX tA re is/19 [dp]re 79
SFX tA re it/8 [dp]re 55
SFX tA re îmes/16 [dp]re 49
SFX tA re îtes/13 [dp]re 48
SFX tA re irent/8 [dp]re 62
SFX tA re rai/19 [dp]re 33
SFX tA re ras/24 [dp]re 32
SFX tA re ra/8 [dp]re 23
SFX tA re rons/16 [dp]re 28
SFX tA re rez/13 [dp]re 27
SFX tA re ront/8 [dp]re 26
SFX tA re rais/19 [dp]re 34
SFX tA re rait/8 [dp]re 24
SFX tA re rions/16 [dp]re 30
SFX tA re riez/13 [dp]re 29
SFX tA re raient/8 [dp]re 25
SFX tA re e/33 [dp]re 76
SFX tA re es/41 [dp]re 75
SFX tA re isse/19 [dp]re 59
SFX tA re isses/24 [dp]re 58
SFX tA re ît/8 [dp]re 45
SFX tA re issions/16 [dp]re 57
SFX tA re issiez/13 [dp]re 56
SFX tA re issent/8 [dp]re 52
SFX tA re s/41 [dp]re 31
SFX tA re ons/48 [dp]re 47
SFX tA re ez/36 [dp]re 63

SFX tD Y 43
SFX tD perdre perdre/61 perdre 54
SFX tD perdre perdant/61 perdre 41
SFX tD perdre perdu perdre 73
SFX tD perdre perdus perdre 72
SFX tD perdre perdue perdre 69
SFX tD perdre perdues perdre 70
SFX tD perdre perds/40 perdre 77
SFX tD perdre perd/14 perdre 71
SFX tD perdre perdons perdre 46
SFX tD perdre perdez perdre 61
SFX tD perdre perdent/14 perdre 35
SFX tD perdre perdais/40 perdre 53
SFX tD perdre perdait/14 perdre 43
SFX tD perdre perdions perdre 66
SFX tD perdre perdiez perdre 65
SFX tD perdre perdaient/14 perdre 44
SFX tD perdre perdis/40 perdre 79
SFX tD perdre perdit/14 perdre 55
SFX tD perdre perdîmes perdre 49
SFX tD perdre perdîtes perdre 48
SFX tD perdre perdirent/14 perdre 62
SFX tD perdre perdrai/37 perdre 33
SFX tD perdre perdras/25 perdre 32
SFX tD perdre perdra/14 perdre 23
SFX tD perdre perdrons perdre 28
SFX tD perdre perdrez perdre 27
SFX tD perdre perdront/14 perdre 26
SFX tD perdre perdrais/40 perdre 34
SFX tD perdre perdrait/14 perdre 24
SFX tD perdre perdrions perdre 30
SFX tD perdre perdriez perdre 29
SFX tD perdre perdraient/14 perdre 25
SFX tD perdre perde/52 perdre 76
SFX tD perdre perdes/25 perdre 75
SFX tD perdre perdisse/37 perdre 59
SFX tD perdre perdisses/25 perdre 58
SFX tD perdre perdît/14 perdre 45
SFX tD perdre perdissions perdre 57
SFX tD perdre perdissiez perdre 56
SFX tD perdre perdissent/14 perdre 52
SFX tD perdre perds/25 perdre 31
SFX tD perdre perdons perdre 47
SFX tD perdre perdez perdre 63

SFX tE N 39
SFX tE dre dre dre 54
SFX tE dre dant dre 41
SFX tE dre ds dre 77
SFX tE dre d dre 71
SFX tE dre dons dre 46
SFX tE dre dez dre 61
SFX tE dre dent dre 35
SFX tE dre dais dre 53
SFX tE dre dait dre 43
SFX tE dre dions dre 66
SFX tE dre diez dre 65
SFX tE dre daient dre 44
SFX tE dre dis dre 79
SFX tE dre dit dre 55
SFX tE dre dîmes dre 49
SFX tE dre dîtes dre 48
SFX tE dre dirent dre 62
SFX tE dre drai dre 33
SFX tE dre dras dre 32
SFX tE dre dra dre 23
SFX tE dre drons dre 28
SFX tE dre drez dre 27
SFX tE dre dront dre 26
SFX tE dre drais dre 34
SFX tE dre drait dre 24
SFX tE dre drions dre 30
SFX tE dre driez dre 29
SFX tE dre draient dre 25
SFX tE dre de dre 76
SFX tE dre des dre 75
SFX tE dre disse dre 59
SFX tE dre disses dre 58
SFX tE dre dît dre 45
SFX tE dre dissions dre 57
SFX tE dre dissiez dre 56
SFX tE dre dissent dre 52
SFX tE dre ds dre 31
SFX tE dre dons dre 47
SFX tE dre dez dre 63

SFX tF Y 42
SFX tF rendre rendre/54 prendre 54
SFX tF rendre renant/8 prendre 41
SFX tF rendre ris/6 prendre 123
SFX tF rendre rise/6 prendre 69
SFX tF rendre rises/9 prendre 70
SFX tF rendre rends/19 prendre 77
SFX tF rendre rend/8 prendre 71
SFX tF rendre renons/16 prendre 46
SFX tF rendre renez/13 prendre 61
SFX tF rendre rennent/8 prendre 35
SFX tF rendre renais/19 prendre 53
SFX tF rendre renait/8 prendre 43
SFX tF rendre renions/16 prendre 66
SFX tF rendre reniez/13 prendre 65
SFX tF rendre renaient/8 prendre 44
SFX tF rendre ris/19 prendre 79
SFX tF rendre rit/8 prendre 55
SFX tF rendre rîmes/16 prendre 49
SFX tF rendre rîtes/13 prendre 48
SFX tF rendre rirent/8 prendre 62
SFX tF rendre rendrai/19 prendre 33
SFX tF rendre rendras/24 prendre 32
SFX tF rendre rendra/8 prendre 23
SFX tF rendre rendrons/16 prendre 28
SFX tF rendre rendrez/13 prendre 27
SFX tF rendre rendront/8 prendre 26
SFX tF rendre rendrais/19 prendre 34
SFX tF rendre rendrait/8 prendre 24
SFX tF rendre rendrions/16 prendre 30
SFX tF rendre rendriez/13 prendre 29
SFX tF rendre rendraient/8 prendre 25
SFX tF rendre renne/33 prendre 76
SFX tF rendre rennes/41 prendre 75
SFX tF rendre risse/19 prendre 59
SFX tF rendre risses/24 prendre 58
SFX tF rendre rît/8 prendre 45
SFX tF rendre rissions/16 prendre 57
SFX tF rendre rissiez/13 prendre 56
SFX tF rendre rissent/8 prendre 52
SFX tF rendre rends/36 prendre 31
SFX tF rendre renons/48 prendre 47
SFX tF rendre renez/36 prendre 63

SFX tG Y 42
SFX tG prendre prendre/61 prendre 54
SFX tG prendre prenant/61 prendre 41
SFX tG prendre pris/6 prendre 123
SFX tG prendre prise/6 prendre 69
SFX tG prendre prises/9 prendre 70
SFX tG prendre prends/40 prendre 77
SFX tG prendre prend/14 prendre 71
SFX tG prendre prenons prendre 46
SFX tG prendre prenez prendre 61
SFX tG prendre prennent/14 prendre 35
SFX tG prendre prenais/40 prendre 53
SFX tG prendre prenait/14 prendre 43
SFX tG prendre prenions prendre 66
SFX tG prendre preniez prendre 65
SFX tG prendre prenaient/14 prendre 44
SFX tG prendre pris/40 prendre 79
SFX tG prendre prit/14 prendre 55
SFX tG prendre prîmes prendre 49
SFX tG prendre prîtes prendre 48
SFX tG prendre prirent/14 prendre 62
SFX tG prendre prendrai/37 prendre 33
SFX tG prendre prendras/25 prendre 32
SFX tG prendre prendra/14 prendre 23
SFX tG prendre prendrons prendre 28
SFX tG prendre prendrez prendre 27
SFX tG prendre prendront/14 prendre 26
SFX tG prendre prendrais/40 prendre 34
SFX tG prendre prendrait/14 prendre 24
SFX tG prendre prendrions prendre 30
SFX tG prendre prendriez prendre 29
SFX tG prendre prendraient/14 prendre 25
SFX tG prendre prenne/52 prendre 76
SFX tG prendre prennes/25 prendre 75
SFX tG prendre prisse/37 prendre 59
SFX tG prendre prisses/25 prendre 58
SFX tG prendre prît/14 prendre 45
SFX tG prendre prissions prendre 57
SFX tG prendre prissiez prendre 56
SFX tG prendre prissent/14 prendre 52
SFX tG prendre prends/25 prendre 31
SFX tG prendre prenons prendre 47
SFX tG prendre prenez prendre 63

SFX tM N 32
SFX tM outre outre foutre 54
SFX tM outre outant foutre 41
SFX tM outre outu foutre 73
SFX tM outre outus foutre 72
SFX tM outre outue foutre 69
SFX tM outre outues foutre 70
SFX tM outre ous foutre 77
SFX tM outre out foutre 71
SFX tM outre outons foutre 46
SFX tM outre outez foutre 61
SFX tM outre outent foutre 35
SFX tM outre outais foutre 53
SFX tM outre outait foutre 43
SFX tM outre outions foutre 66
SFX tM outre outiez foutre 65
SFX tM outre outaient foutre 44
SFX tM outre outrai foutre 33
SFX tM outre outras foutre 32
SFX tM outre outra foutre 23
SFX tM outre outrons foutre 28
SFX tM outre outrez foutre 27
SFX tM outre outront foutre 26
SFX tM outre outrais foutre 34
SFX tM outre outrait foutre 24
SFX tM outre outrions foutre 30
SFX tM outre outriez foutre 29
SFX tM outre outraient foutre 25
SFX tM outre oute foutre 76
SFX tM outre outes foutre 75
SFX tM outre ous foutre 31
SFX tM outre outons foutre 47
SFX tM outre outez foutre 63

SFX tU N 5
SFX tU istre istre tistre 54
SFX tU istre issu tistre 73
SFX tU istre issus tistre 72
SFX tU istre issue tistre 69
SFX tU istre issues tistre 70

SFX uA Y 46
SFX uA tre tre/54 tre 54
SFX uA tre tant/8 tre 41
SFX uA tre tu/6 tre 73
SFX uA tre tus/9 tre 72
SFX uA tre tue/6 tre 69
SFX uA tre tues/9 tre 70
SFX uA ttre ts/19 ttre 77
SFX uA ttre t/8 ttre 71
SFX uA tre ts/19 embatre 77
SFX uA tre t/8 embatre 71
SFX uA tre tons/16 tre 46
SFX uA tre tez/13 tre 61
SFX uA tre tent/8 tre 35
SFX uA tre tais/19 tre 53
SFX uA tre tait/8 tre 43
SFX uA tre tions/16 tre 66
SFX uA tre tiez/13 tre 65
SFX uA tre taient/8 tre 44
SFX uA tre tis/19 tre 79
SFX uA tre tit/8 tre 55
SFX uA tre tîmes/16 tre 49
SFX uA tre tîtes/13 tre 48
SFX uA tre tirent/8 tre 62
SFX uA tre trai/19 tre 33
SFX uA tre tras/24 tre 32
SFX uA tre tra/8 tre 23
SFX uA tre trons/16 tre 28
SFX uA tre trez/13 tre 27
SFX uA tre tront/8 tre 26
SFX uA tre trais/19 tre 34
SFX uA tre trait/8 tre 24
SFX uA tre trions/16 tre 30
SFX uA tre triez/13 tre 29
SFX uA tre traient/8 tre 25
SFX uA tre te/33 tre 76
SFX uA tre tes/41 tre 75
SFX uA tre tisse/19 tre 59
SFX uA tre tisses/24 tre 58
SFX uA tre tît/8 tre 45
SFX uA tre tissions/16 tre 57
SFX uA tre tissiez/13 tre 56
SFX uA tre tissent/8 tre 52
SFX uA tre s/41 tre 31
SFX uA tre ts/36 embatre 31
SFX uA tre tons/48 tre 47
SFX uA tre tez/36 tre 63
